Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.094

Waiver of confidentiality.

A signed application to purchase a firearm shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility to purchase a firearm to an inquiring court, law enforcement agency, or the Washington state patrol firearms background check program.

[ 2023 c 161 s 5; 2019 c 3 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018); 2018 c 201 s 6004; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 411.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 161: See note following RCW 9.41.090.

Finding—Short title—Effective dates—Implementation—2019 c 3 (Initiative Measure No. 1639): See notes following RCW 9.41.360.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.